Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3978
Public policy.

It is hereby recognized and declared as a matter of legislative determination that in the field of human nutrition, safe, clean, wholesome milk is indispensable to the health and welfare of the citizens of the State of Nebraska; that milk is a perishable commodity susceptible to contamination and adulteration; that the production and distribution of an adequate supply of clean, safe, and wholesome milk are significant to sound health; and that minimum standards are declared to be necessary for the production and distribution of milk and milk products.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 2, p. 69;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.88;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3913;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 14.